Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 12. Hospitals, Physicians, and Nurses.

Sec. 34.35.450.
Hospital’s, physician’s, and nurse’s lien.

An operator of a hospital in the state, a licensed special nurse in a hospital in the state, or a physician who furnishes service to a person who has a traumatic injury has a lien upon any sum awarded to the injured person or the personal representative of the injured person by judgment or obtained by a settlement or compromise to the extent of the amount due the hospital, nurse, or physician for the reasonable value of the service furnished before the date of judgment, settlement, or compromise, together with costs and reasonable attorney fees that the court allows, incurred in the enforcement of the lien. AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

do not apply to a claim, right of action, or money accruing under AS 23.30 (Workers’ Compensation Act).

When the person receiving hospitalization has a contract providing for indemnity or compensation for the sum incurred for hospitalization, the hospital has a lien upon the amount payable under the contract. The party obligated to make reimbursement under the contract may pay the sum due under it directly to the hospital, and this payment is a full release of the party making the payment under the contract in the amount of the payment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 135 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.35.455.
Limitation on extent of lien.

Except as otherwise provided, a lien under AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

may not be allowed for hospitalization or the services of a physician or licensed special nurse furnished after a settlement is made by or on behalf of the person causing the injury unless the settlement is made within 20 days from the date of the injury. A lien is not allowed for necessary attorney fees, costs, and expenses incurred by the injured person in securing a settlement, compromise, or judgment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 75 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 135 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.35.460.
Notice of lien.

To perfect the lien described in AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

, the hospital or the owner or operator of the hospital, or the physician or licensed special nurse, shall, not later than 90 days after the date of injury, or in no event later than 90 days after the discharge of the injured person from the hospital or the provision of the physician’s services, file a notice of lien substantially in the form prescribed in AS

34.35.465

, containing a general description of the services rendered and a statement of the amount claimed, with a recorder’s office, and shall, after the 90-day period, before the date of judgment, settlement, or compromise, serve a copy of the notice of lien by registered mail, at the last known address, upon the person alleged to be responsible for causing the injury and from whom damages are claimed, and upon the insurance carrier that has insured against the liability, if the insurance carrier is known.

A hospital or the owner or operator of a hospital, or a physician or licensed special nurse who files a notice of lien under (a) of this section for hospitalization or services provided to a recipient of medical assistance under AS 47 shall mail a copy of the notice of lien to the unit of the Department of Health and Social Services that administers medical assistance for needy persons under AS 47. The copy must be sent by certified mail no later than 30 days after the filing of the notice of lien under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 135 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2000)

Sec. 34.35.465.
Form of notice.

The form of notice required by
AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

shall be substantially as follows:

NOTICE is hereby given that has rendered services for hospitalization, physician services, or special nurses’ services for , a person who was injured on the day of at in the state, and the (claimant) hereby claims a lien upon any money due or owing or any claim for compensation, damages, contribution, settlement, or judgment from alleged to have caused the injuries and any other person liable for the injury or obligated to compensate the injured person on account of the injuries; the hospitalization, physician services, or special nurses’ services were rendered to the injured person between the day of and : General Description of Services Rendered and Statement of Amount Due and that 90 days have not elapsed since that time; that the claimant’s demands for care and service is in the sum of $ and that no part of the demands has been paid, except $, and that there is now due and owing and remaining unpaid thereof, after deducting all credits and offsets, the sum of $, in which amount lien is hereby claimed. United States of America State of Alaska ss. Judicial District I, , being first duly sworn on oath say: That I am named in the foregoing claim of lien; that I have read the same and know the contents thereof and believe the same to be true. Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , 2 Notary Public for Alaska

Click to view

History.

(§ 4 ch 75 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 135 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “2...” was substituted for “19..” in accordance with sec. 105, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 34.35.470.
Lien docket. [Repealed, § 7 ch 135 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 34.35.475.
Settlement after notice.

A person or insurer is liable to a hospital, physician, or nurse, in the amount that the hospital, physician, or nurse is entitled to receive, for 180 days after the date of a payment to the injured person, the heirs of the injured person, personal representatives, or the attorney of them, when the person or insurer

receives a copy of notice of lien, or the lien is recorded as provided in AS

34.35.460

and

34.35.465

;

makes the payment after receipt of notice or the recording of the lien as compensation for the injury suffered; and

does not pay the hospital, physician, or the licensed special nurse for the reasonable value of the services rendered to the injured person and claimed in the notice of lien, or so much of the value of the services as can be satisfied out of a judgment, settlement, or compromise, after paying the attorney fees, costs, and expenses incurred in connection with it.

The hospital, physician, or nurse has a cause of action, during the 180 days, against the person or insurer.

History.

(§ 6 ch 75 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 135 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.35.480.
Enforcement of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

may be foreclosed or enforced by an action brought by the claimant, a representative, or assignee within one year after the filing of the lien.

In the action, upon entering a decree for the plaintiff, the court shall allow as part of the costs, all money paid for the filing and recording of the lien notice, together with a reasonable attorney fee.

History.

(§ 7 ch 75 SLA 1975)

Sec. 34.35.481.
Priority of liens.

A lien perfected by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

47.05.075

has priority immediately after a lien perfected by a hospital, nurse, or physician under AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.480

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 85 SLA 2000)

Sec. 34.35.482.
Definition.

In AS

34.35.450

—

34.35.482

, “physician” means a person licensed as a chiropractor under AS 08.20 or a person licensed as a doctor of medicine under AS 08.64.

History.

(§ 6 ch 135 SLA 1996)

Secs. 34.35.485 — 34.35.500.
[Renumbered as AS 34.35.900 — 34.35.930.]